Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 13 Copyrighted Music

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights and remedies of co-owners of copyright, 3 ALR3d 1301.

Unfair competition by direct reproduction of literary, artistic or musical property, 40 ALR3d 566.

Parody as copyright infringement or fair use under Federal Copyright Act (17 USC § 101 et seq.), 75 ALR Fed 822.

Excuse of omission of copyright notice under 17 USC § 405, 91 ALR Fed 336.

Interest on award of damages and profits for federal copyright infringement, 91 ALR Fed 839.

Burden and sufficiency of proof under “first sale” doctrine in prosecution for copyright infringement, 94 ALR Fed 101.

Invalidity of copyright as defense to copyright infringement action, 141 ALR Fed 507.

Application of “De Minimis Non Curat Lex” to Copyright Infringement Claims”, 150 ALR Fed 661.